Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.330.250

Condensed compliance reports.

(1) Beginning September 1, 2011, second-class districts may annually submit a condensed compliance report to the superintendent of public instruction.

(2) The boards of directors of second-class districts that choose to submit a condensed compliance report must:

(a) Dedicate a public meeting for reviewing the report and receiving public testimony;

(b) Adopt the report at a public meeting; and

(c) Require the report to be signed by the school district superintendent and chair of the board and acknowledged before a notary public.

(3) Compliance requests from the superintendent of public instruction not tied to funding are voluntary for second-class districts submitting a condensed compliance report.

(4) For the purposes of this section, compliance requests do not include data requests required to be submitted in accordance with federal or state law or for purposes of program evaluation or accountability, including data for a comprehensive K-12 education data improvement system.

[ 2011 c 45 s 1.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—2011 c 45: "If any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state." [ 2011 c 45 s 51.]